Massachusetts, session 194th, H2462.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 43M of chapter 114 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 15, the following words:-
"Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, a funeral establishment in
possession of the cremated remains of a human body which is not claimed by a next-of-kin or
duly authorized representative within 12 months after the date of cremation may have the
remains interred or placed in a common grave, niche, or crypt in a cemetery, or scattered in an
area of the cemetery designated for that purpose;"
and, inserting in place thereof the following words:
of 2

"Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, a funeral establishment in
possession of the cremated remains of a human body which is not claimed by a next-of-kin or
duly authorized representative within 12 months after the date of cremation may have the
remains interred or placed in a common grave, niche, or crypt in a cemetery, scattered in an area
of the cemetery designated for that purpose, or scattered at sea;"
of 2